Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Acquisition of Airport Facilities

183.475.
Acquisition of airport facilities by counties bordering state boundary.

All counties in this state located on the boundary line between this state and any other state, or which are contiguous to such counties, as well as all governmental units which are located in such boundary counties, or contiguous counties, are authorized, separately, jointly with each other, or jointly with any other municipality or political subdivision of any boundary state, to acquire, equip, construct, expand, lease, improve, police and operate airports within this state or either within or without the geographical limits of any county, municipality or political subdivision of any boundary state; and for those purposes to exercise any other powers or functions and be subject to any provisions provided by KRS Chapter 183 as to aviation, without regard to any express or implied limitations to or within this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 48, § 13; 1958, ch. 153, § 30; 1960, ch. 179, § 20; 1968, ch. 83, § 4; 1980, ch. 188, § 138, effective July 15, 1980; 2022 ch. 218, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

183.476.
Functions by municipalities in field of aviation are governmental in character.

The acquisition of any lands for the purpose of establishing airports or other air navigation facilities; the acquisition of airport protection privileges; the acquisition, establishment, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipping and operation of airports and other air navigation facilities, and the exercise of any other powers granted to air boards or municipalities in this chapter, are hereby declared to be public, governmental and municipal functions, exercised for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity, and such lands and other property, easements and privileges acquired and used by such air boards or municipalities in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter shall and are hereby declared to be acquired and used for public, governmental and municipal purposes and as a matter of public necessity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 48, § 10; 1960, ch. 179, § 21.

183.480.
Jurisdiction over privately owned airports. [Repealed.]

183.490.
Condemnation for privately owned airports. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 24, § 3; 1958, ch. 153, § 32; 1960, ch. 179, § 22; 1976, ch. 140, § 87; repealed by 2022 ch. 218, § 6, effective July 14, 2022.

183.500.
Extension of runways across roads — Signals. [Repealed.]

183.505.
Transportation Cabinet authorized to aid publicly used airports — Regulations.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the cabinet may give such advice and assistance, including financial aid, engineering and technical assistance, within the limits of its resources, as it deems advisable, to enable any person to acquire, construct, expand, maintain and operate airports devoted to public use and may establish regulations to insure that such airports shall continue to be devoted to public use under reasonable conditions and for reasonable periods of time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 215, § 1.

183.510.
Condemnation for landing strips. [Repealed.]

183.520.
Maintenance of runways of county and city airports by Department of Highways. [Repealed.]

183.525.
Kentucky aviation economic development fund — Sources and distribution of fund moneys — Use of fund moneys.

The “Kentucky Aviation Economic Development Fund” is established in the State Treasury. Beginning on July 1, 2000, all receipts collected under KRS Chapter 139 from the sales or use tax on aviation jet fuel shall be deposited in this fund.

The fund may also receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall include earnings from investments of moneys from the fund.

Any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

The Transportation Cabinet shall use all moneys deposited in the fund or accruing to the fund for the development, rehabilitation, and maintenance of publicly owned or operated aviation facilities and for other aviation programs within the Commonwealth that will benefit publicly owned or operated aviation facilities.

The cabinet shall be prohibited from expending moneys deposited in the fund for administrative costs incurred by the cabinet or for any purpose other than the development, rehabilitation, and maintenance of publicly owned or operated aviation facilities and other aviation programs benefiting publicly owned or operated aviation facilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 400, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

Compiler's Notes.

Acts 1998, ch. 400, § 5 provided: “This Act is effective for tax periods beginning on or after July 1, 2000.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. I, A, 2, (1) at 2017.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. III, 1 at 2023.

See Transportation Cabinet Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Pt. III, 2 at 2023.